Utah statutes.
34A-6-204.   State agencies and political subdivisions to establish programs.

The head of each state agency and each political subdivision of the state shall establish and maintain an occupational safety and health program equivalent to the program for other employments in the state.  The commission may not assess monetary penalties against any state agency or political subdivision under Section 34A-6-307.

